src/morphology/phonology.twolc
"Stem vowel u:o change before suffix"
!! * __@RULENAME@__ \\  
u:o <=> Cns: _  (%^SV:) ([š|ž]) (%^WG:) (%^CLEN:) (%^RLEN:|%^RVSH:) (%^SLEN:) %^SVLOW:  ;  !RULE SV !! 1) olmooš, olmožin
 		Cns  _  %> [ j Vow | o ] ; !! 2) 


"Stem vowel u2:o change before suffix"
!! * __@RULENAME@__ \\  
u2:o <=> Cns:  _ Triggers:* %> [ j Vow | o ] ;  !RULE SV  ! SVLOW together with u?
 		
!!€ uáinu>o
!!€ uáino>o


 		
! stáálu stááloust

"Second vowel shortening"
!! * __@RULENAME@__ \\ eemeed : emedân, savvoon : savo 
Vx:0 <=> _ Vx: (Cns:+) (%^FCD:) (%^CSH:|%^WG:) ([%^RLEN:|%^RVSH:]) %^SVSH:  ;  !RULE SV !eemeed : emedân sai4joos
    where Vx in ( e o a á u i y ä ) ;

!eemeed:emedân

!!€ eemeed^CSH^SVSH>ân
!!€ 0em0ed00>ân


!!€ kappeer^CSH^SVSH>ân
!!€ ka0p0er00>ân

"Stem vowel:0 in front of â"
!! * __@RULENAME@__ \\ aiguu:aaigâ
Vx:0 <=> Cns: _  ([%^ÁE:|%^ÁI:]) â Cns:* Triggers:*  [%>|.#.]   ;  !RULE SV 
         \%> _ (%^SV:) Cns: ([%^ÁE:|%^ÁI:]) %^FCD: â Cns:* Triggers:*  [%>|.#.]   ;  !RULE SV 
    where Vx in ( â e o a á u i y ä) ;

! this rule should be generalised, we talk about a ban on o>u strings

"Stem â deleting"
!! * __@RULENAME@__ \\ kandâ:kandii
â:0 <=> \%> _ i [j|i] (%^WG:) (%^RVSH:) [%>|.#.]  ; !RULE SV 
        \%> _ i  Triggers:* %>  i: ; !RULE SV
!         \%> _ Triggers:* i  Triggers:* %>  i: ; !RULE SV

!! !Suffix vowel rules

"Suffix vowel lengthening"
!! * __@RULENAME@__ \\ long á in kissáást, nuorâ : nuorááin, hyeni:hyeneest
%^SV:Vx <=> :Vx (%^CLEN:) (%^VHIGH:|%^VBACK:) (%^RVSH:) (%>)  _ (Cns)  NotSuffixBorder:* %^SLEN:   ;  !RULE SV ! hyeneest
       where Vx in ( á o u e a i   y ä  ) ; !nuorâ : nuorááin




!!€ ki^RVssá^SV^WG^CLEN^SLEN>st
!!€ ki0ssáá000>st

!!€ mi^RVllo^SV^WG^CLEN^SLEN>st
!!€ mi0lloo000>st

!!€ huksi^SVm^SLEN>ist
!!€ huksiim0>ist


!!€ táál^RCu^SV^WG^RVSH^SLEN^SVLOW>st
!!€ táál0oo0000>st

"Suffix i5:j for lexicon APINA"
!! * __@RULENAME@__ \\ salijn
i5:j  <=> Cns: i %> _ ; !RULE SV 


"Suffix i5:0 and i5ä:e"
!! * __@RULENAME@__ \\ timotein oboen, not Chariliein
i5:0 <=> o  e %> _ ;  !RULE SUFF
		 Vow i  %> _ ;!RULE SUFF
!         Cns _ ä:e Cns: Cns:+ Vow: s %^ÁE: %^WG: %^RVSH: [%>|.#.]  ; !pi5ällás%^ÁE


"Suffix i:j for i and e-stems"
!! * __@RULENAME@__ \\  
i:j <=> [i: | e: | i2: | i3: ] Triggers:*   %> _ [l|d|n|m|g|t|%>|.#.|#];  !RULE SUFF


"Vowel copy in suffix"
%^VO:Vx <=> :Vx Triggers:* %> _ ; !RULE SUFF
!! * __@RULENAME@__ \\  for imperative Sg3, at least
	where Vx in ( a á i u o ) ;


!! Suffix consonant rules


"Adjective illative in -vân after u"
j:v <=> u u:  %> _ â n ; !RULE SUFF

"Shortening u for vân illative"
u:0 <=> u _  %> :v ; !RULE SV

!! !!Other rules

"Word final vowel deletion"                 
!!  * __@RULENAME@__ \\ for vaskâm:vaaskâ
Vx:0 <=> _  %^FVD: (%^WG:|%^CSH:) [.#.|%>] ;  !RULE SC
          where Vx in (â i);

!!€ sollâ^FVD>ii
!!€ soll00>ii

"Potential vowel shortening for contract verbs"
!! * __@RULENAME@__ \\  -áážep becomes -áš etc.
Vx:0 <=> Vx _ %> š [.#.|v|j] ; !RULE SV
	where Vx in (a á i o u ) ;



"Insertion of pleonastic hyphen"
%#:%- <=> Vx _ :Vx ;!RULE HYPH
    where Vx in (a e i o u ä á) ;



!!€ skäi4nâ^VBACK>đ
!!€ skainâ0>đ

!!€ skä^RVi4nâ^VBACK>đ
!!€ ska0inâ0>đ

!!€ hu^RVm^RCo^SVb^WG^RLEN^SLEN^RLEN^SLEN
!!€ huum0oob00000

!!€ hu^RVm^RCo^SVb^RLEN^SLEN^RVSH>ân
!!€ hu0m0o0b000>ân

!!€ hu^RVm^RCo^SVb^RVSH>ist
!!€ hu0m0o0b0>ist
